Hawaii statutes.
[§11-361] Aggregation of
contributions and expenditures. (a) All contributions and expenditures of
a person whose contributions or expenditures are financed, maintained, or
controlled by any corporation, labor organization, association, party, or any other
person, including any parent, subsidiary, branch, division, department, or
local unit of the corporation, labor organization, association, party,
political committees established and maintained by a national political party,
or by any group of those persons shall be considered to be made by a single
person.

(b) A contribution by a partnership shall not
exceed the limitations in this section and shall be attributed to the
partnership and to each partner in direct proportion to the partner's share of
the partnership profits, according to instructions that shall be provided by
the partnership to the party, candidate, or committee receiving the
contribution.

(c) A contribution by a limited liability
company shall be treated as follows:

(1) A contribution by a limited liability company
that is treated as a partnership by the Internal Revenue Service shall be
considered a contribution from a partnership;

(2) A contribution by a limited liability company
that is treated as a corporation by the Internal Revenue Service shall be
considered a contribution from a corporation;

(3) A contribution by a limited liability company
with a single individual member that is not treated as a corporation by the
Internal Revenue Service shall be attributed only to that single individual
member; and

(4) A limited liability company that makes a
contribution shall, at the time the limited liability company makes the
contribution, provide information to the party, committee, or candidate
receiving the contribution specifying how the contribution is to be attributed.

(d) A person's contribution to a party that is
earmarked for a candidate or candidates shall be included in the aggregate
contributions of both the person and the party. The earmarked funds shall be
promptly distributed by the party to the candidate.

(e) A contribution by a dependent minor shall
be reported in the name of the minor but included in the aggregate
contributions of the minor's parent or guardian. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next